Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1945.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 141 of Title 41, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The landlord, owner, or operator of a public lodging
establishment with at least five rental units or properties, which
shall include apartments and hotels, must require that each employee
Req. No. 12814 Page 1

of t he establishment undergo a background screening as a condition
of employment.
B. The background screening required under subsection A of this
section must be performed by a consumer reporting agency in
accordance with the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act and must
include a screening of criminal history records and sexual predator
and sexual offender registries of all fifty states and the District
of Columbia.
C. A landlord, owner, or operator of an apartment or hotel may
disqualify a person from employment if the person has been convicted
or found guilty of, or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere
to, regardless of adjudication, any of the following offenses:
1. A criminal offense involving disregard for the safety of
others which, if committed in this state, is a felony or a
misdemeanor of the first degree or, if committed in another state,
would be a felony or a misdemeanor of the first degree if committed
in this state;
2. A criminal offense committed in any jurisdiction which
involves violence, including, but not limited to, murder, sexual
battery, robbery, carjacking, home-invasion robbery, and stalking.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 142 of Title 41, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 12814 Page 2

A landlord, owner, or operator of an apartment or hotel shall do
all of the following:
1. Require that each employee undergo background screening as a
condition of employment;
2. Maintain a log accounting for the issuance and return of all
keys for each dwelling unit; and
3. Establish policies and procedures for the issuance and
return of dwelling unit keys and regulating the storage of, and
access to, unissued keys.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12814 AO 02/20/25












Req. No. 12814 Page 3